lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 0 ්ල .
SFX 1389 Y 1
SFX 1389 0 ලව .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 ල් .
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 0 ලා .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 ලි .
SFX 1065 Y 1
SFX 1065 0 ලී .
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 0 ලු .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 ලූ .
SFX 4713 Y 1
SFX 4713 0 ෙනතුරු .
SFX 3588 Y 1
SFX 3588 0 ලෙ .
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 ලේ .
SFX 1991 Y 1
SFX 1991 0 ලෝ .
SFX 4498 Y 1
SFX 4498 0 ්තාවෙන් .
SFX 4357 Y 1
SFX 4357 0 ්‍යතාවයන් .
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 ්ව .
SFX 4208 Y 1
SFX 4208 0 ්ෂ .
SFX 2169 Y 1
SFX 2169 0 ්ස .
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 0 ්හ .
SFX 1283 Y 1
SFX 1283 0 ්් .
SFX 2793 Y 1
SFX 2793 0 ගමට .
SFX 1263 Y 1
SFX 1263 0 ණත් .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 0 ගම් .
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 0 ගමු .
SFX 3448 Y 1
SFX 3448 0 වෙන්ඩ .
SFX 4164 Y 1
SFX 4164 0 කඩුව .
SFX 2457 Y 1
SFX 2457 0 වෙන්ද .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 වෙන්න .
SFX 860 Y 1
SFX 860 0 වෙන්ම .
SFX 1814 Y 1
SFX 1814 0 ුවාට .
SFX 4782 Y 1
SFX 4782 0 ුවාද .
SFX 3041 Y 1
SFX 3041 0 ුවාම .
SFX 3040 Y 1
SFX 3040 0 ුවාය .
SFX 713 Y 1
SFX 713 0 ාවකින් .
SFX 4133 Y 1
SFX 4133 0 කාමීන්ගේ .
SFX 2695 Y 1
SFX 2695 0 නටම .
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 වෙද්දී .
SFX 320 Y 1
SFX 320 0 වාදය .
SFX 3221 Y 1
SFX 3221 0 ැවිණ .
SFX 1268 Y 1
SFX 1268 0 ගැන්ම .
SFX 3219 Y 1
SFX 3219 0 ැවිය .
SFX 526 Y 1
SFX 526 0 වාදි .
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 0 වාදී .
SFX 3926 Y 1
SFX 3926 0 දෙන් .
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 0 දෙනා .
SFX 1689 Y 1
SFX 1689 0 දෙනු .
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 0 වාට .
SFX 3236 Y 1
SFX 3236 0 ාහම .
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 0 වාද .
SFX 3506 Y 1
SFX 3506 0 වාන .
SFX 1598 Y 1
SFX 1598 0 වාම .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 වාය .
SFX 3502 Y 1
SFX 3502 0 වාර .
SFX 2342 Y 1
SFX 2342 0 ිකරණ .
SFX 3496 Y 1
SFX 3496 0 වාස .
SFX 2363 Y 1
SFX 2363 0 ාහි .
SFX 3268 Y 1
SFX 3268 0 ාරාමයට .
SFX 3976 Y 1
SFX 3976 0 ත්තා .
SFX 3192 Y 1
SFX 3192 0 ිකරු .
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 0 ීකරණය .
SFX 4097 Y 1
SFX 4097 0 ක්කාරයෝ .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 0 ්වෙනි .
SFX 4217 Y 1
SFX 4217 0 ්වෙනු .
SFX 3316 Y 1
SFX 3316 0 ාචල් .
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 0 ාරාමයේ .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 ාට .
SFX 3314 Y 1
SFX 3314 0 ාණ .
SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 0 ාද .
SFX 714 Y 1
SFX 714 0 ාන .
SFX 3285 Y 1
SFX 3285 0 ාප .
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 0 ාම .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 ාය .
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 0 ාර .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 0 ාල .
SFX 3565 Y 1
SFX 3565 0 වතුන්ට .
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 ාව .
SFX 3244 Y 1
SFX 3244 0 ාස .
SFX 1354 Y 1
SFX 1354 0 ාහ .
SFX 2839 Y 1
SFX 2839 0 කඩේ .
SFX 3827 Y 1
SFX 3827 0 පාලනයේ .
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 0 මටත් .
SFX 1055 Y 1
SFX 1055 0 වනුයේ .
SFX 4196 Y 1
SFX 4196 0 ්සත් .
SFX 751 Y 1
SFX 751 0 ගල් .
SFX 3353 Y 1
SFX 3353 0 හානි .
SFX 246 Y 1
SFX 246 0 ෙමි .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 ෙමු .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 වනතුරු .
SFX 3868 Y 1
SFX 3868 0 න්දර .
SFX 2234 Y 1
SFX 2234 0 ෙවත් .
SFX 2636 Y 1
SFX 2636 0 පියන් .
SFX 3867 Y 1
SFX 3867 0 න්දා .
SFX 3864 Y 1
SFX 3864 0 න්දු .
SFX 4529 Y 1
SFX 4529 0 ්ටයක් .
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 0 මානයට .
SFX 1412 Y 1
SFX 1412 0 නුවන් .
SFX 571 Y 1
SFX 571 0 වුණ .
SFX 3457 Y 1
SFX 3457 0 වුම .
SFX 2612 Y 1
SFX 2612 0 මානයේ .
SFX 1034 Y 1
SFX 1034 0 ාවලිය .
SFX 4227 Y 1
SFX 4227 0 ්වීම්වල .
SFX 1586 Y 1
SFX 1586 0 වුව .
SFX 4999 Y 1
SFX 4999 0 ිසියට .
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 0 සකට .
SFX 1655 Y 1
SFX 1655 0 යකදීම .
SFX 2597 Y 1
SFX 2597 0 යකදීය .
SFX 3841 Y 1
SFX 3841 0 පත්වීම .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 වේදීන් .
SFX 4060 Y 1
SFX 4060 0 ග්‍රහණය .
SFX 2172 Y 1
SFX 2172 0 ්වෙනවා .
SFX 3163 Y 1
SFX 3163 0 ිතාවය .
SFX 3802 Y 1
SFX 3802 0 බීජ .
SFX 2009 Y 1
SFX 2009 0 රියක් .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 සක් .
SFX 2391 Y 1
SFX 2391 0 ාචාර .
SFX 4996 Y 1
SFX 4996 0 ිසියේ .
SFX 3426 Y 1
SFX 3426 0 සකි .
SFX 2624 Y 1
SFX 2624 0 බීම .
SFX 3366 Y 1
SFX 3366 0 හතර .
SFX 2287 Y 1
SFX 2287 0 ුක .
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 0 හත් .
SFX 4161 Y 1
SFX 4161 0 කථන .
SFX 706 Y 1
SFX 706 0 ුට .
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 0 ුණ .
SFX 1326 Y 1
SFX 1326 0 ුද .
SFX 545 Y 1
SFX 545 0 ුන .
SFX 3068 Y 1
SFX 3068 0 ුප .
SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 0 ුම .
SFX 763 Y 1
SFX 763 0 ුය .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 ුර .
SFX 3446 Y 1
SFX 3446 0 වේදයක් .
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 ුව .
SFX 4764 Y 1
SFX 4764 0 ුෂ .
SFX 2254 Y 1
SFX 2254 0 ුහ .
SFX 2582 Y 1
SFX 2582 0 යෙනුත් .
SFX 1260 Y 1
SFX 1260 0 ණොත් .
SFX 2614 Y 1
SFX 2614 0 මානයක් .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 යේද .
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 0 යේම .
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 0 යේය .
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 0 ගාර .
SFX 3078 Y 1
SFX 3078 0 ුණෙන් .
SFX 3146 Y 1
SFX 3146 0 ින්වත් .
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 0 න්හිදී .
SFX 4532 Y 1
SFX 4532 0 ්ටද .
SFX 4530 Y 1
SFX 4530 0 ්ටම .
SFX 4770 Y 1
SFX 4770 0 ුවෙන .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 ්ට් .
SFX 2988 Y 1
SFX 2988 0 ෙල් .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 ්ටා .
SFX 299 Y 1
SFX 299 0 ෙලා .
SFX 1488 Y 1
SFX 1488 0 ්ටු .
SFX 925 Y 1
SFX 925 0 ිවලට .
SFX 4523 Y 1
SFX 4523 0 ්ටේ .
SFX 1038 Y 1
SFX 1038 0 ානුකූල .
SFX 3981 Y 1
SFX 3981 0 තුවට .
SFX 2757 Y 1
SFX 2757 0 ණින් .
SFX 3723 Y 1
SFX 3723 0 යන්ගෙන්ද .
SFX 2731 Y 1
SFX 2731 0 තුවේ .
SFX 3456 Y 1
SFX 3456 0 වුමක් .
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 0 නන් .
SFX 3500 Y 1
SFX 3500 0 වාරයේ .
SFX 4291 Y 1
SFX 4291 0 ්ලම් .
SFX 3837 Y 1
SFX 3837 0 පයන් .
SFX 362 Y 1
SFX 362 0 ීමටත් .
SFX 3451 Y 1
SFX 3451 0 වෙත .
SFX 217 Y 1
SFX 217 0 වෙන .
SFX 950 Y 1
SFX 950 0 වෙල .
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 0 ‍රිය .
SFX 788 Y 1
SFX 788 0 වර්ධන .
SFX 2081 Y 1
SFX 2081 0 පතිතුමා .
SFX 752 Y 1
SFX 752 0 ගනිමින් .
SFX 1220 Y 1
SFX 1220 0 යානු .
SFX 448 Y 1
SFX 448 0 වටත් .
SFX 3978 Y 1
SFX 3978 0 තේත් .
SFX 4780 Y 1
SFX 4780 0 ුවානා .
SFX 3133 Y 1
SFX 3133 0 ියක්ම .
SFX 3692 Y 1
SFX 3692 0 යීමට .
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 0 ෙක .
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 0 ෙට .
SFX 3011 Y 1
SFX 3011 0 ෙත .
SFX 4720 Y 1
SFX 4720 0 ෙද .
SFX 102 Y 1
SFX 102 0 ෙන .
SFX 4689 Y 1
SFX 4689 0 ෙඳ .
SFX 699 Y 1
SFX 699 0 ෙම .
SFX 3424 Y 1
SFX 3424 0 සටහනක් .
SFX 4675 Y 1
SFX 4675 0 ෙස .
SFX 4160 Y 1
SFX 4160 0 කඳු .
SFX 1578 Y 1
SFX 1578 0 සීමට .
SFX 3991 Y 1
SFX 3991 0 තැනට .
SFX 629 Y 1
SFX 629 0 ාගාරය .
SFX 2827 Y 1
SFX 2827 0 කවි .
SFX 2874 Y 1
SFX 2874 0 ්ලයක් .
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 0 ගුණ .
SFX 985 Y 1
SFX 985 0 තැන් .
SFX 1933 Y 1
SFX 1933 0 සීමේ .
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 වෙයි .
SFX 1964 Y 1
SFX 1964 0 වාදීන්ගේ .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 තුමා .
SFX 2286 Y 1
SFX 2286 0 ුකම් .
SFX 3695 Y 1
SFX 3695 0 යිනුත් .
SFX 2171 Y 1
SFX 2171 0 ්වෙන්න .
SFX 1703 Y 1
SFX 1703 0 තුමන් .
SFX 2623 Y 1
SFX 2623 0 බෝල .
SFX 3076 Y 1
SFX 3076 0 ුතම .
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 0 කමට .
SFX 4159 Y 1
SFX 4159 0 කමය .
SFX 1592 Y 1
SFX 1592 0 වීමකට .
SFX 3764 Y 1
SFX 3764 0 මැද .
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 0 ුත් .
SFX 4883 Y 1
SFX 4883 0 ුතා .
SFX 1327 Y 1
SFX 1327 0 ුතු .
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 0 කම් .
SFX 1279 Y 1
SFX 1279 0 කමේ .
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 වීමක් .
SFX 864 Y 1
SFX 864 0 වීමකි .
SFX 4138 Y 1
SFX 4138 0 කළා .
SFX 4137 Y 1
SFX 4137 0 කළු .
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 0 කළේ .
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 වන්ගෙන් .
SFX 3253 Y 1
SFX 3253 0 ාවගේ .
SFX 4066 Y 1
SFX 4066 0 ගෙට .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 0 ගෙන .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 ගෙය .
SFX 4440 Y 1
SFX 4440 0 ්නං .
SFX 1949 Y 1
SFX 1949 0 වෙන්නට .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 ්නට .
SFX 2735 Y 1
SFX 2735 0 තාවලට .
SFX 2913 Y 1
SFX 2913 0 ්නද .
SFX 2912 Y 1
SFX 2912 0 ්නම .
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 0 ්නය .
SFX 4068 Y 1
SFX 4068 0 ගුණයෙන් .
SFX 4425 Y 1
SFX 4425 0 ්නල .
SFX 4190 Y 1
SFX 4190 0 ්සමෙන් .
SFX 2204 Y 1
SFX 2204 0 ්නව .
SFX 4408 Y 1
SFX 4408 0 ්න් .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 ්නා .
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 0 ්නැ .
SFX 2456 Y 1
SFX 2456 0 වෙන්නෙ .
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 0 ්නී .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 වෙන්නේ .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 ්නෙ .
SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 0 ්නේ .
SFX 417 Y 1
SFX 417 0 ්නෝ .
SFX 3254 Y 1
SFX 3254 0 ාවකදී .
SFX 3106 Y 1
SFX 3106 0 ිවුණ .
SFX 2299 Y 1
SFX 2299 0 ිවන්නේ .
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 0 ඹීමට .
SFX 4623 Y 1
SFX 4623 0 ොක් .
SFX 724 Y 1
SFX 724 0 වනවා .
SFX 2577 Y 1
SFX 2577 0 රම්භ .
SFX 3182 Y 1
SFX 3182 0 ිකිරීම .
SFX 1224 Y 1
SFX 1224 0 ම්වල .
SFX 3849 Y 1
SFX 3849 0 පක්ෂ .
SFX 4586 Y 1
SFX 4586 0 ෝත් .
SFX 3383 Y 1
SFX 3383 0 සෙහි .
SFX 1648 Y 1
SFX 1648 0 යාගේත් .
SFX 3086 Y 1
SFX 3086 0 ුක්ත .
SFX 4274 Y 1
SFX 4274 0 ්වනුයේ .
SFX 1061 Y 1
SFX 1061 0 වංශ .
SFX 2335 Y 1
SFX 2335 0 ිකොට .
SFX 3905 Y 1
SFX 3905 0 නටවත් .
SFX 819 Y 1
SFX 819 0 ංග .
SFX 1537 Y 1
SFX 1537 0 ියකුට .
SFX 1022 Y 1
SFX 1022 0 ියේය .
