lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අන්තර්/435,2638,3502
කට්ට/167,169,477,1535,4164
කැප/10,16,24,42,52,59,64,76,80,83,86,87,88,102,113,126,143,145,216,217,220,236,241,247,262,270,272,273,294,343,344,379,422,457,657,864,917,926,1335,1373,1445,1746,2169,2220,3040,4202
කුර/3,20,24,121,194,207,619,628,1325,1813,2252,2536,2918,3052,3115,3291,3313,3362,3578,4462,4498,4795,4899,4901
කෙන්/1220,3698,3926
ගතව/24,33,42,51,59,80,82,83,113,126,140,208,209,230,299,310,341,362,543,922,1814,2694,3024,4718
චන්දන/14,3496
තිලක/5,377,788,3674,4208
දඩය/4,22,23,28,50,65,71,75,105,222,391,431,965,4097
දරුව/9,10,12,20,31,33,41,72,77,79,89,91,95,129,151,155,174,190,192,221,225,279,364,395,396,436,473,590,697,737,738,778,1113,1301,1363,2664,4609
නැත/3,6,12,138,262,265,275,463,909,3041,4440,4779
නැති/11,12,35,45,52,64,76,86,87,100,149,163,176,177,189,194,212,213,343,365,392,407,446,466,571,583,1279,1486,1588,2065,2066,2260,3455,4515
නැහැ/2,11,87,95,217,227,247,293,958,1465,2589
නිලධාරී/396,526,3888
නොගත/275,1000,1243,3890
නොවෙන/93,1597,1598,1920,3373
පුතා/1,6,10,14,40,56,69,96,104,107,150,151,173,312,653,1014,1389,4317
පූජාව/1065
පොඩි/52,86,87,145,481,3976
බැර/42,161,168,960,1303,1627,1717,2955
බෙදා/63,125,204,289,347,454,484,752,853,1528,2145,2318,3357,3365
භාර/2,6,10,13,15,19,25,27,48,60,63,117,125,166,236,260,329,358,415,484,506,533,560,582,610,894,896,994,997,1101,1112,1257,1258,1429,1689,2190,2410,2713,2825,3907,3988,4126
මයි/4,56,815,1991
මල්/30,432,645,800,1374,1657,2530,2708,3413,3506,3522,4135
මහින්ද/14,377,1359
මැර/16,27,42,51,59,69,76,80,81,83,92,102,121,140,161,216,230,241,262,263,270,280,310,362,375,402,588,622,721,766,913,1462,1828,1830,2331,2746,4887
මුදාහරින/24,58,67,256
මොන/5,8,10,20,35,45,163,181,267,328,333,602,697,957,1059,1339,1710,1892,1965,2216,3235
යනු/11,15,21,54,354,2457,2458
යාන/2,5,13,15,19,20,21,24,38,48,180,255,318,713,1355,1558,1886,4480,4481,4482,4509,4510,4511,4517
යෙද/3,10,42,51,59,64,76,80,83,88,113,126,131,143,145,203,208,211,247,264,294,310,316,326,362,375,402,445,465,492,588,595,656,913,1146,1192,1503,1798,1799,1836,2233,2238,2350,2467,3002,3219,3221,3449,4692,4693,4697,4699,4759
යොදා/63,90,125,312,347,358,506,534,535,582,752,1268
ලක්ෂ/2,13,15,19,21,26,38,43,46,123,297,302,325,390,531,574,628,685,757,799,1129,1130,1262,1263,1400,1655,1714,1760,1762,2131,2132,2197,2762,3757,4021,4022,4024,4353,4354,4375
ලාබ/2,11,13,21,777,979
වරක/1,5,16,20,25,147,350,1283,3317
වල්/57,78,86,183,233,967,968,990,1632,1959,2641
වහන/2,5,21,44,58,2169
වළක/5,11,20,33,42,85,237,342,349,695,821,906,931,1028,1160,2180,2183,2370,2866,2868,3151
විත/2,5,15,181,714,730,793,2014
වියන/611,2363
විල/3,4,5,6,16,17,20,22,23,32,42,243,353,481,602,858,929,943,1937,2168,2185,3237,3242,3246,3247,3285,3401,4653,4655
වීර/27,47,51,74,81,92,97,136,146,154,164,195,288,321,369,421,527,596,715,780,788,1061,1374,2064,2148,2192,2480,2498,2798,3314,4347
වුණ/3,6,12,16,20,24,49,98,118,129,192,224,246,267,275,286,303,327,847,1178,3236,3282,4013
වුන/3,5,6,11,16,20,24,129,192,246,286,303,417,1178
වූව/3,4,6,9,12,20,23,41,72,79,89,129,155,174,190,192,266,267,275,279,420,473,590,662,845,942,1302,2800,2817
වෙන්/861,1445,2157,2804
ව්‍යුහ/2,13,15,19,26,27,38,62,70,90,101,141,170,281,320,380,665,674,787,954,1599,1600,2485
සටන්/1959,2799,3559,3560,4133,4134
සම්බන්ධ/2,9,10,11,13,17,19,21,49,52,60,70,76,87,131,137,143,161,176,199,202,258,293,309,390,427,470,530,562,809,890,1256,1334,1428,2342,4976
සහකරු/14,242,304,525
සිංහ/27,183,521,1039,2064,2793,3273
සියල්ල/1,3,4,6,7,8,9,11,12,14,31,32,40,41,72,78,79,85,89,100,153,228,278,336,339,1308,2225,2695,4039
සිව/5,16,20,24,349,517,559,702,925,1021,1513,1640,2269,2850,2858,4180,4183,4237,4238,4239,4262,4456,4463
සිවු/664,975,1595,2049,2108
සිහින/170,2997,4704
ස්වේච්ඡා/860
හැකි/2,10,11,12,35,36,52,60,64,76,87,100,131,149,156,177,189,191,217,218,294,343,366,392,422,428,444,445,446,465,466,480,724,785,1048,1206,1395,1710,1927,1950,1952,2028,2029,2030,2044,2124,2591,2948,3699
හිම/3,5,15,549,777,1171,3316
හෙල/1,5,12,20,33,51,59,80,82,83,103,113,114,144,462,616,924,2184,2874,4242
හේවා/92,991,1841
